Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 7

Tennessee Teen Court Program of 2000

37-1-701. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Teen Court Program of 2000.”

Acts 2000, ch. 792, § 1.

37-1-702. Authority to establish teen court — Procedure for participation — Determining factors for participation — Authority of teen court.

Any juvenile court judge is authorized to establish a teen court program pursuant to this part. In a jurisdiction in which there are multiple juvenile court judges, each judge may establish a teen court program. In any jurisdiction in which a teen court program is established, a teen charged with an offense specified under this part may receive a deferred judgment, a condition of which is successful completion of the teen court program. As a part of such program, the teen shall receive a disposition recommended by a five-member teen court and confirmed by the juvenile court judge. The teen court shall be held at a place to be determined by the local juvenile court judge.

The procedure for the court to determine participation in the teen court is as follows:

Pursuant to local, written procedures adopted by the juvenile court, participation in the teen court program may be initiated by an officer of the court under the informal adjustment or pretrial diversion process of § 37-1-110;

After the court places a child on judicial diversion or adjudicates a child delinquent or unruly pursuant to § 37-1-129, the court may direct that the disposition determination will be made by the teen court;

When a juvenile court determines that a case is appropriate to be handled by the teen court, the teen shall be informed by the court of the procedures for teen court disposition and shall be given an opportunity to enter a waiver of rights to participate in a teen court disposition. The court shall inform the teen that if the teen enters a waiver, including a waiver of any right for an attorney to be present during the dispositional stage, juvenile court proceedings shall be suspended for a period of six (6) months or such other time authorized by the local, written procedures of the juvenile court and a teen court may be empanelled to hear evidence on disposition; such teen court shall deliberate, and shall make a recommendation to the judge for disposition of the case, which may be confirmed by the juvenile court without further proceedings. If the teen elects to not enter a waiver, the judge shall proceed with the case as provided by law without referral to the teen court.

In choosing cases to be referred to the teen court for disposition, the juvenile court shall determine that:

The offense or attempted offense underlying the juvenile petition was one (1) of the following:

Assault, § 39-13-101;

Burglary, § 39-14-402;

Theft of property, § 39-14-103;

Vandalism, § 39-14-408;

Forgery, § 39-14-114;

Cruelty to animals, § 39-14-202;

Unauthorized use of vehicle, § 39-14-106;

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

Disorderly conduct, § 39-17-305;

Harassment, § 39-17-308;

Criminal trespass, § 39-14-405;

Traffic offense, § 37-1-146;

Runaway, § 37-1-102(b)(32)(D);

Truancy, § 37-1-102(b)(32)(A);

Violation of curfew, § 39-17-1702;

Unruly, § 37-1-102(b)(32);

Violation of any of the following sections of the Tennessee Drug Control Act, compiled in title 39, chapter 17, part 4:

§ 39-17-418(a) or (b), relative to simple possession or casual exchange of a controlled substance;

§ 39-17-422(a) or (b), relative to smelling or inhaling fumes of any glue, paint, gasoline, aerosol, chlorofluorocarbon gas or other substance containing a solvent having the property of releasing toxic vapors or fumes, or possessing any glue containing a solvent having the property of releasing toxic vapors or fumes for the purpose of smelling or inhaling fumes or vapors;

§ 39-17-426, relative to possession of gentiana lutea, also known as jimsonweed, on the premises or grounds of any school; or

§ 39-17-454, relative to simple possession or casual exchange of a controlled substance analogue;

Any criminal offense, status offense, violation, infraction or other prohibited conduct involving the possession, use, sale or consumption of any alcoholic beverage, wine or beer; or

A second or subsequent violation, within a one (1) year period, of § 39-17-1505, regarding possession, purchase or acceptance of tobacco products, or offering false or fraudulent proof of age for the purpose of purchasing or receiving any tobacco product;

The teen will benefit more from participation in the teen court and any disposition that may be recommended than from any other disposition that may be imposed;

The teen, in the presence of at least one (1) of the teen's parents or guardian, has executed an informed waiver of rights, including any right to have an attorney present at the dispositional stage; and

The particular case does not have any special circumstances, such as suspected mental illness or developmental disability of the teen, or special needs of the victim of the offense, that make the case inappropriate for referral to the teen court.

A teen court has the authority to conduct proceedings and to receive evidence and hear testimony related to the dispositional stage. The teen court shall consist of five (5) teen members chosen by the juvenile court as set out in § 37-1-704. The teen members shall choose a presiding officer who shall conduct the proceeding under the supervision of the juvenile court judge. After hearing all evidence and testimony, the teen court shall retire to deliberate and a written decision shall be written by the presiding officer.

The written decision shall be transmitted to the juvenile court judge as a recommendation, together with all papers relating to the case. The written recommendation will specify a proposed disposition together with reasons therefor.

Upon receipt of the recommendation, the judge shall review it, along with all papers relating to the case. The judge may accept, modify or reject the recommendation. If the judge accepts the recommendation as presented or modified, the judge shall confirm it by order. If the judge rejects the recommendation, the judge shall permit any additional hearing as may be necessary and shall enter an order as necessary.

The juvenile court shall dismiss the petition or charges at the conclusion of the deferral period if the court determines that the teen has successfully completed the teen court program. If the teen fails to successfully complete the prescribed program, or if a new delinquent or unruly petition is filed against the teen during the deferral period, the petition under which the teen court disposition was ordered may be reinstated and the case may proceed as if the teen court disposition had never been entered.

Acts 2000, ch. 792, § 1; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; Acts 2001, ch. 341, §§ 1-9; 2012, ch. 848, § 9; 2016, ch. 600, §§ 13-16.

Compiler's Notes. Former subdivisions (e)(1) and (e)(2) of this section were redesignated in 2001 as §37-1-703(a) and (b).

Former subsection (f) of this section was redesignated in 2001 as §37-1-704 (a) and (b).

Former subsections (g) through (j) of this section were redesignated in 2001 as §37-1-705(a)-(d).

Section 39-17-1505, referred to in (c)(1)(S), was amended in 2015 and now includes a prohibition against purchasing or receiving vapor products.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, in (b)(1), substituted “informal adjustment or pretrial diversion process of §37-1-110” for “informal adjustment process of §37-1-110” at the end, and deleted the former second sentence which read: “Successful completion of a teen court program may be a condition of pretrial diversion under Rule 23 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure;”; rewrote (b)(2)(A) which read, “(2)(A) After the court makes a determination, in the presence of at least one (1) of the teen's parents or legal guardian, that the teen is a child subject to the court's jurisdiction and is delinquent under §37-1-131 or unruly under §37-1-132, the court may direct that the disposition determination will be made by the teen court;”; inserted “or attempted offense” in the introductory language of (c)(1); and deleted (c)(1)(H) which read, “(H) Criminal attempt, §39-12-101;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 17. July 1, 2016.

37-1-703. Authority of teen court.

The teen court has the authority, in a case referred by the juvenile court, to recommend disposition of the case as permitted by this part. The teen court shall have no authority to recommend transfer of temporary legal custody to any person or entity or to require placement or treatment in any specific program. If the teen court determines that such transfer of temporary legal custody or placement is the only appropriate remedy, the case shall be referred back to the juvenile court for further proceedings. The teen court may recommend:

Restitution, as defined in § 37-1-102, and subject to the provisions of § 37-1-131(b);

Performance of community service work, subject to the requirements of § 37-1-131(a)(7);

Limitations upon driving privileges; provided, that any disposition governed by § 55-10-701 shall include an order of denial of driving privileges;

Participation as a teen court member;

Attendance at court-approved education workshops on subjects such as substance abuse, safe driving, or victim awareness, or any of these things;

Curfew limitations;

School attendance; and

Essay writing or similar research or school projects.

Any dispositional recommendation shall comply with the requirements of this title, unless contrary to the express provisions of this part. Dispositional alternatives shall be chosen from a list approved by the juvenile court or shall be similar in kind to those set forth in subsection (a)(1).

Acts 2000, ch. 792, § 1; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; Acts 2001, ch. 341, § 7.

37-1-704. Empaneling teen court members.

Any juvenile court judge who establishes a teen court shall choose, at the beginning of the school year, a panel of twelve (12) or more teenagers to serve as teen court members. Each teen court for a specific case shall consist of five (5) members chosen from the panel of twelve (12). Such teens shall be chosen from the local public and private high schools or middle schools. They shall be selected by the juvenile court judge in consultation with the local principal or principals. The judge shall attempt to choose teens who are not otherwise active in extracurricular activities.

Youth participating in teen court programs may not receive any compensation for their service; provided, however, that youth participating in teen court may receive unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation, or bona fide awards in recognition of public service in the form of a plaque, trophy, desk item, tee-shirt, beverage mug, plastic cup, wall memento and similar items so long as any such item is not in a form that can be readily converted to cash. In the event a youth participating in teen court attends a conference, training, retreat or similar event as a part of the youth's participation in teen court, the youth may be reimbursed for such travel expenses in conformity with comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter. The juvenile court shall certify the name, address, and school attended of each teen court member to the secretary of state who shall issue a certificate of participation for each to the juvenile court judge.

Acts 2000, ch. 792, § 1; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; Acts 2001, ch. 341, § 8; 2002, ch. 539, § 1.

37-1-705. Legislative intent — Location of teen court proceedings — Immunity of participants — Confidentiality.

It is the legislative intent that teen court proceedings shall be, to the extent possible, conducted by teens with limited adult participation. The Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure shall not apply. The juvenile court judge shall have the authority to appoint teens to serve as prosecuting and defense attorneys. It is further the legislative intent that the juvenile court shall have the flexibility to establish procedures, not inconsistent with this part, to assure fairness and equity and to protect the rights of all parties.

Every juvenile court judge, whether or not such judge establishes a teen court, may hold juvenile court proceedings at a public high school or middle school in the county of the court's jurisdiction for at least one (1) day per year. Such court proceeding shall be publicized in cooperation with the local school authorities in a manner to encourage teen observation and, where appropriate, participation.

Each participant in teen court proceedings has the same immunity provided by law for judicial proceedings.

All records used in, or otherwise related to, teen court proceedings shall be confidential to the full extent provided by current law, except as necessary to permit functioning of the teen court. Nothing contained in this section shall, in any manner, alter the confidentiality of records or proceedings under current juvenile court law.

Acts 2000, ch. 792, § 1; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; Acts 2001, ch. 341, § 9.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

37-1-706. Construction of part.

Nothing in this part shall be deemed to impair the authority of juvenile courts to adopt different or alternative procedures for the establishment of or the operation of an existing teen court program within their respective jurisdictions. Any such teen court program shall meet due process standards including, but not limited to, those pertaining to informed and voluntary participation in the program and any necessary waiver of rights.

Upon adoption of local, written procedures, a juvenile court may delegate responsibility for operation of a teen court program to a person licensed to practice law in this state.

Any reference to “juvenile court” or “juvenile court judge” in this part shall be interpreted to include a magistrate under § 37-1-107.

Acts 2001, ch. 341, § 10; 2009, ch. 235, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to revise appropriate references from “child support referees” and “juvenile referees” to “child support magistrates” and “juvenile magistrates” in the code as supplements are published and volumes are replaced.